Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202085-2008
Community college gap assistance; recipient; duties; termination of assistance; when.

(1) A recipient of community college gap assistance under the community college gap assistance program shall:

(a) Maintain regular contact with faculty of the eligible program to document the applicant's progress in the program;

(b) Sign any necessary releases to provide relevant information to community college faculty or case managers, if applicable;

(c) Discuss with faculty of the eligible program any issues that may affect the recipient's ability to complete the eligible program and obtain and maintain employment;

(d) Attend all required courses regularly; and

(e) Meet with faculty of the eligible program to develop a job-search plan.

(2) A community college may terminate community college gap assistance under the community college gap assistance program for a recipient who fails to meet the requirements of this section.

Laws 2015, LB519, § 34.